sl-SI: Vrsta zaključka: Sijaj; Mat; Naraven/oljen; Odprte pore; Saten; Drugo
hu: Felületkezelés típusa: Fényes; Matt; Természetes / olajozott; Nyitott pórusú; Selyemfényű; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tipul de finisaj: Lucios; Mat; Natural/uns cu ulei; Pori deschiși; Satinat; Altele
fi: Pintakäsittelyn tyyppi: Kiiltävä; Matta; Luonnollinen/öljytty; Avohuokoinen; Satiini; Muu
es: Tipo de acabado: Brillante; Mate; Natural/aceitado; Poro abierto; Satinado; Otro
zh-TW: 表面處理類型: 亮面; 霧面; 自然色 / 上油處理; 開放漆; 緞面; 其他
ko: 마감 유형: 유광; 무광; 천연/오일 처리; 오픈 포어; 새틴; 기타
bg-BG: Тип покритие: Гланц; Мат; Естествен/омаслен; Отворени пори; Сатен; Други
it: Tipo di finitura: Lucido; Opaco; Naturale/oliato; A poro aperto; Satinato; Altro
zh-CN: 成品类型: 光泽; 哑光; 自然/涂油; 开放漆孔; 缎面; 其他
tr: Bitirme türü: Parlak; Mat; Doğal/yağlı; Açık gözenek; Saten; Diğer
en: Finish type: Gloss; Matte; Natural/oiled; Open pore; Satin; Other
th: ประเภทการตกแต่ง: เงา; ด้าน; ธรรมชาติ/เคลือบน้ำมัน; เปิดรูพรุน; ซาติน; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ povrchové úpravy: Lesk; Mat; Přírodní/olejovaný; S otevřenými póry; Satén; Jiné
ja: 仕上げタイプ: グロス; マット; ナチュラル/オイル; オープンポア; サテン; その他
da: Behandlingstype: Blank; Mat; Naturlig/olieret; Åben pore; Satin; Andet
lt-LT: Apdailos tipas: Blizgi; Matinė; Natūrali / alyvuota; Atvirų porų; Satininė; Kita
de: Art des Finishs: Glanz; Matt; Natur/geölt; Offenporig; Satin; Sonstige
pt-BR: Tipo de acabamento: Brilhante; Fosco; Natural/oleado; Poro aberto; Acetinado; Outros
nl: Afwerkingstype: Glans; Mat; Natuurlijk/geolied; Open porie; Zijdeglans; Overige
sk-SK: Typ povrchovej úpravy: Lesklé; Matné; Prírodné/olejované; S otvorenými pórmi; Saténové; Iné
pl: Typ wykończenia: Błyszczące; Matowe; Naturalne/olejowane; Otwarte pory; Satynowe; Inne
el: Τύπος φινιρίσματος: Γυαλιστερό; Ματ; Φυσικό/με λάδι; Ανοιχτών πόρων; Σατινέ; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de acabamento: Brilho; Mate; Natural/oleado; Poro aberto; Acetinado; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta završne obrade: Sjaj; Mat; Prirodno / nauljeno; Otvorene pore; Saten; Ostalo
nb: Finishtype: Blank; Matt; Naturlig / oljet; Åpen pore; Sateng; Annet
sv: Typ av finish: Glans; Matt; Naturlig/oljad; Öppna porer; Satin; Övrigt
vi: Loại hoàn thiện: Bóng; Mờ; Tự nhiên/phủ dầu; Vân gỗ hở; Bóng mờ; Khác
ru: Тип отделки поверхности: Глянец; Матовая; Натуральная/промасленная; Открытые поры; Сатин; Другое
fr: Type de finition: Brillant; Mat; Naturel/huilé; Pores ouverts; Satiné; Autre